Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 5 Disposition of Surplus State Books

45-13-80 through 45-13-85.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 594, § 1-3/HB 287, effective July 1, 2013, redesignated former Article 5, consisting of Code Sections 45-13-80 through 45-13-85 as present Part 1C of Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 20, consisting of Code Sections 20-3-47 through 20-3-47.5, respectively.